Hawaii statutes.
§671-12 Review by panel required; notice;
presentation of inquiry; request for a more definite statement of the inquiry.
(a) Any person or the person's representative having concerns regarding the
existence of a medical tort shall submit an inquiry to the medical inquiry and
conciliation panel before a suit based on the circumstances of the inquiry may
be commenced in any court of this State. Inquiries shall be submitted to the
medical inquiry and conciliation panel in writing and shall include the facts
upon which the inquiry is based and the names of all parties against whom the
inquiry is or may be made who are then known to the person or the person's
representative.

(b) Within five business days after receipt of
an inquiry the panel shall give notice of the inquiry and the statement of the
inquiry, by certified mail, to all health care providers and others who are or
may be parties to the inquiry and shall furnish copies of written inquiries to
those persons. The notice shall set forth a date, not more than twenty days
after the mailing of the notice, within which any health care provider against
whom an inquiry is made shall file a written response and a date and time, not
less than five days following the last date for filing a response, for a proceeding
upon the inquiry by the panel and the parties. The notice shall describe the
nature and purpose of the panel's proceedings and shall designate the place of
the meeting. The times originally set forth in the notice may be enlarged by
the chairperson, on due notice to all parties, for good cause.

(c) If the statement of the inquiry in the
notice is so vague or ambiguous that any party receiving notice of the inquiry
cannot reasonably be required to frame a written response, the party may submit
a written request to the director of commerce and consumer affairs for a more
definite statement before filing the written response. Copies of the request
shall be provided to the panel and all affected parties. The request, which
shall be ex parte and stay the proceedings of the panel until notice of the
director's decision is given to the panel and all parties, shall specify the
defects complained of and the details desired. The director may deny, grant,
or modify the request at the director's own discretion, without the necessity
of a hearing, although the director may reach a decision after consulting with
the panel or any party or parties. The director shall provide notice of the
decision to the panel and all affected parties. If the request is granted and
any party so directed fails to provide a more definite statement of the inquiry
within five days after notice of the decision, the panel may make an order as
it deems just. This subsection shall not be used as a tactic to delay the
proceedings. [L 1976, c 219, pt of §2; gen ch 1985; am L 1989, c 245, §1; am L
1993, c 96, §1; am L 2012, c 296, pt of §4]

Law Journals and Reviews

Tort and Insurance "Reform" in a Common Law Court.
14 UH L. Rev. 55 (1992).

Case Notes

Medical claim conciliation panel requirement is procedural
rather than substantive, and does not apply to cases filed in federal court on
the basis of diversity jurisdiction. 29 F. Supp. 2d 1174 (1998).

Claim was allowed to be heard because there was substantial
compliance with procedural requirements. 69 H. 305, 741 P.2d 1280 (1987).

Where certain counts of plaintiff's complaint alleged errors
or omissions in professional practice by a health care provider, thus falling
under the definition of "medical tort" under §671-1(2), court
properly ruled plaintiff could not proceed with those counts of suit without
first submitting them to medical claim conciliation panel as required by
§671-16 and this section. 89 H. 188, 970 P.2d 496 (1998).

Where plaintiff chose to sidestep requirements of §671-16 and
this section by filing suit before seeking resolution of claims by a medical
claim conciliation panel as required under these statutes, court properly
dismissed complaint. 89 H. 188, 970 P.2d 496 (1998).

Where medical claim conciliation panel decision was filed
after commencement of plaintiffs' suit in trial court, plaintiffs failed to
comply with the requirements of this section; thus, trial court did not err in
concluding it had no subject matter jurisdiction. 90 H. 425, 978 P.2d 863
(1999).

Subsection (a) requires only that a claimant set forth facts
upon which the claim is based and include the names of all parties against whom
the claim is or may be made who are then known to the claimant; nowhere in this
section does it require plaintiffs to name all known negligent health care
providers; having filed the requisite medical claim conciliation panel claim,
participated in the required hearing, and rejected the panel's finding of no
actionable negligence, plaintiffs satisfied this chapter's statutory
prerequisites for filing suit in circuit court. 111 H. 74, 137 P.3d 980 (2006).

Where defendants city, city department of health, and city
director of health fit within the definition of "health care
facility" under §323D-2 and "health care provider" under §671-1,
and as to them, each of the eight counts alleged a "medical tort",
plaintiff was required to submit the eight counts against them to the medical
claim conciliation panel pursuant to this section as a precondition to filing
suit. 93 H. 490 (App.), 6 P.3d 362 (2000).

Circuit court properly dismissed plaintiff's claims for lack
of jurisdiction where, although plaintiff was not the patient in the case, plaintiff's
allegations arose directly from an alleged medical tort involving plaintiff's
son, a patient, and subsection (a) states that "any person" must
submit a statement of the claim to the medical claim conciliation panel before
a suit based on that claim may be commenced in any state court. 121 H. 235
(App.), 216 P.3d 1258 (2009).

Plaintiff's claims of neglect, abuse, and failure to provide
a safe home against care home defendants did not constitute "medical torts"
within the meaning of §671-1; thus, plaintiff was not required to submit
plaintiff's claims to a medical claim conciliation panel (MCCP) pursuant to
this section and §671-16 as a condition for plaintiff to file suit against
defendants, and the circuit court erred in dismissing plaintiff's suit based on
plaintiff's failure to submit plaintiff's claims to a MCCP. 128 H. 405 (App.),
289 P.3d 1041 (2012).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next